Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.532] COVERAGE FOR ACUPUNCTURE SERVICES. new text end new text begin (a) Health plans must cover acupuncture services for the treatment of pain and ongoing pain management when those services are performed by a person who is authorized to practice acupuncture. new text end new text begin (b) Coverage under this section must include at least 30 visits for acupuncture services before a health plan company can require a prior authorization for further acupuncture services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed to a Minnesota resident on or after that date. new text end